California, session 20252026, AB702.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17133.2 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17133.2. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, gross income shall not include any amount of qualified investment interest income generated by a taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified investment interest” means interest income that a taxpayer generates on an investment during the taxable year and, without the qualified taxpayer’s consent and against the qualified taxpayer’s will, is stolen, sold, or otherwise transferred during the taxable year so that the interest income is no longer under the possession or control of the taxpayer.(c) A deduction shall not be allowed with respect to any amount that a taxpayer excludes from income pursuant to this section. SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.